Utah statutes.
17C-1-505.   Authority to purchase agency bonds.
(1)  Any person, firm, corporation, association, political subdivision of the
state, or other entity or public or private officer may purchase bonds issued
by an agency under this part with funds owned or controlled by the purchaser.
(2)  Nothing in this section may be construed to relieve a purchaser of agency
bonds of any duty to exercise reasonable care in selecting securities.
